Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
342B [OLD]

AIR
POLLUTION

REPEALED. L 1992, c 240, §2.

CHAPTER
342B

AIR
POLLUTION CONTROL

Part I. Definitions and General Provisions

Section

342B-1 Definitions

342B-2 Administration

342B-3 General functions, duties, and powers of
the director

342B-4 Other powers of department and director
not affected

342B-5 Effect of laws, ordinances, and rules

342B-5.5 Exemptions

342B-6 Short title

342B-7 Annual reports

Part II. Air Pollution

342B-11 Prohibition

342B-12 Specific powers of the director

342B-13 Public participation

342B-14 Variances

342B-15 Complaints; hearings; appointment of
masters

342B-16 Research, educational, and training
programs

342B-17 Air quality modelers

342B-18 Annual reports to neighboring communities

342B-19 Unpermitted releases; timely notice

Part III. Permit Program

342B-21 Specific functions, duties, and powers of
the director

342B-22 Permit and permit renewal; requirements

342B-23 Application for permit

342B-24 Action on a permit application

342B-25 Approval of permit

342B-26 General and temporary permits; single
permit

342B-27 Other permit action

342B-28 Recordkeeping and monitoring requirements

342B-29 Fees

342B-30 Judicial review

342B-31 Government records; confidential
information

342B-32 Clean air special fund

342B-33 Minimum permit conditions

342B-34 Exceptions

342B-35 Crematoriums

Part IV. Enforcement and Penalties

342B-41 Inspection of premises

342B-42 Enforcement

342B-43 Emergency powers; procedures

342B-44 Injunctive and other relief

342B-45 Citation

342B-46 Appeal

342B-47 Civil penalties

342B-48 Administrative penalties

342B-49 Criminal penalties

342B-50 Disposition of collected fines and penalties

342B-51 Enforcement by state and county
authorities

342B-52 Nonliability of department personnel

342B-53 Other action not barred

342B-54 Priority in courts

342B-55 Consent orders; settlement agreements

342B-56 Citizen suits

Part V. Small Business Assistance Program

342B-61 Small business assistance program

342B-62 Compliance advisory council;
establishment;

appointment, number, and term of members;
duties

342B-63 Small business ombudsman for air pollution
control;

qualifications; duties

Part VI. Greenhouse Gas Emissions

342B-71 Statewide greenhouse gas emissions limit,
adoption

342B-72 Greenhouse gas emissions limits; rules

342B-73 Schedule of fees; establishment

Note

Department of transportation's bridge rehabilitation and
replacement program; temporary exemption from certain construction requirements
of this chapter through June 30, 2017 or until completion. L 2012, 2 218.

Cross References

Asbestos and lead pollution control, see chapter 342P.

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Indoor air quality program, see §§321-411 to 413.

Law Journals and Reviews

Enforcement of Environmental Laws in Hawai‘i. 16 UH L. Rev.
85.

Ala Loop and the Private Right of Action Under Hawai‘i
Constitution Article XI, Section 9: Charting a Path Toward a Cohesive
Enforcement Scheme. 33 UH L. Rev. 367 (2010).

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next